District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-105.74

Applicability.

Repealed.

Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-293, § 5, 60 DCR 2613
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7013, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (225 days) repeal of this section, see § 5 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Revised Budget Request Temporary Adjustment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-14, September 19, 2013, 60 DCR 9554, 20 DCSTAT 1764).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 5 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Revised Budget Request Emergency Adjustment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-74, May 23, 2013, 60 DCR 7592).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 7013 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 5 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Revised Budget Request Emergency Adjustment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-74, May 23, 2013, 60 DCR 7592, 20 DCSTAT 1424).
For temporary repeal of this section, see § 7013 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary repeal of this section, see § 7013 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.